District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.44

Officers — Removal.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 197, ch. 269, § 44
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.44.
1981 Ed., § 29-344.
1973 Ed., § 29-919a.